Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 4 Wills

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-4-1

through 53-4-54, and was based on Laws 1766, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 292; Laws 1804, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 291; Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 253; Laws 1812, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 292; Laws 1816, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 293; Laws 1821, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 293; Laws 1827, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 294; Laws 1829, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 295; Laws 1841, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 296; Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 296; Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 297; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 299; Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 41, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1855, p. 227, § 2; Ga. L. 1859, p. 35, § 1; Ga. L. 1859, p. 36, § 2; Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1711, 1712, 1751, 1752, 2226, 2451, 2452, 2454, 2455, 2530, 2537-2545, 2628; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 102, § 1; Code 1868, §§ 1751, 1752, 1791, 1792, 2220, 2447-2450, 2529, 2538-2547, 2628; Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 48, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 1761, 1762, 1800, 1801, 2246,
2483-2486, 2570, 2579-2588, 2670; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 47, § 1; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 66, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 1761, 1762, 1800, 1801, 2246, 2483-2486, 2570, 2579-2588, 2670; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 135, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2510, 2511, 3081, 3353-3355, 3357, 3358, 3464, 3474-3483, 3576; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3029, 3030, 3657, 3929-3931, 3933, 3934, 4040, 4052-4061, 4156; Ga. L. 1922, p. 47, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 114, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 85-1102, 113-901 through 113-905, 113-907, 113-908, 113-1001, 113-1013 through 113-1022; Ga. L. 1941, p. 331, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 236, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1141, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 288, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 361, §§ 1-8; Ga. L. 1959, p. 299, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 746, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1093, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 403, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 880, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1432, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 53; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1257, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 632, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1720, §§ 18, 19; Ga. L. 1991, p. 660, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 53.